Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle C. Conversion

§ 17-16-1115.
Conversion of corporation to limited liability company.

A domestic corporation may be converted to a domestic limited liability company pursuant to chapter 26 of this title.

A foreign corporation may be converted to a domestic limited liability company pursuant to chapter 26 of this title.

Repealed By Laws 2009, Ch. 115, § 3.

After the conversion is approved by the shareholders, the limited liability company shall file articles of organization which satisfy the requirements of W.S.

17-29-201

and include:

A statement that the corporation was converted to a limited liability company;

Its former name;

The state of formation and the date of organization; and

A statement of the number of votes cast by the shareholders for and against conversion and if the vote is less than unanimous, the number or percentage required to approve the conversion under the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The conversion takes effect when the articles of organization are filed or at any later date specified in the articles.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 119, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 94, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to conversion of entities, see §

17-26-101

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “chapter 26 of this title” for “this section” in (a) and (b); and repealed former (c), which read: “The terms and conditions of a conversion of a corporation to a limited liability company shall be approved by all the shareholders or by a number or percentage specified in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, provided that any shareholders who will be liable to a greater extent after conversion, solely by reason of being an owner, shall approve the terms and conditions of the conversion.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “W.S.

17-29-201

” for “W.S.

17-15-107

” in the introductory language of (d).

§ 17-16-1116.
Effect of conversion.

Upon conversion:

All property owned by the corporation remains in the limited liability company;

All obligations of the converting corporation continue as obligations of the resulting limited liability company; and

An action or proceeding pending against the converting corporation may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 119, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to conversion of entities, see §

17-26-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.